Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 17 Commercial Driver Licenses [Repealed]

§§ 31-17-101 and 31-17-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1, constituted the short title and definitions provisions of the Uniform Commercial Driver License Act. For present similar provisions, see §

31-7-102

.

§§ 31-17-103 and 31-17-104.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §§

31-7-301

and

31-7-302

by Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to notification required by driver, and employer responsibilities, see §§

31-7-301

and

31-7-302

, respectively.

§ 31-17-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 5.

Cross references. —

As to commercial driver's licenses, see §§

31-7-304

through

31-7-313

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1, related to the requirement of a commercial driver's license.

§ 31-17-106.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-7-303

by Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to exemptions, see §

31-7-303

.

§§ 31-17-107 through 31-17-109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1, related to commercial driver qualification standards, instruction permits and driver's licenses, respectively.

§ 31-17-110.
[Repealed and Renumbered.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 5.

through (f) Renumbered as §

31-7-304

(a) through (e) by Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to commercial driver's license, see §§

31-7-304

through

31-7-313

.

§ 31-17-111.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-7-305

by Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to commercial driver's licenses, see §§

31-7-304

through

31-7-313

.

§ 31-17-112.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-7-306

by Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to commercial driver's licenses, see §§

31-7-304

through

31-7-313

.

§ 31-17-113.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-7-307

by Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to commercial driver's licenses, see §§

31-7-304

through

31-7-313

.

§§ 31-17-114 through 31-17-118.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §§

31-7-308

through

31-7-312

by Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to commercial driver's licenses, see §§

31-7-304

through

31-7-313

.

§§ 31-17-119 and 31-17-120.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 5.

Cross references. —

As to commercial driver's licenses, see §§

31-7-304

through

31-7-313

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1, related to fees and general penalties.

Section

31-17-119

was also purportedly amended by Laws 1993, ch. 136, § 1. However, this amendment was not given effect in light of the repeal of §

31-17-119

by Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 5.